SwahiliAnalyzer.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 1p+ 2p+ 3p+ 1Pl+ 3Pl+ PresPerf+ Future+ Past+ PresPro+

LEXICON Root
Sub ;

LEXICON Sub

ni:1p+ Tense;
u:2p+ Tense;
a:3p+ Tense;
tu:1Pl+ Tense;
wa:3Pl+ Tense;



LEXICON Tense
li:Past+ Obj;
ta:Future+ Obj;
na:PresPro+ Obj;
me:PresPerf+ Obj;

LEXICON Verb
lipa:Verb  #;
piga:Verb #;
penda:Verb #;
sumbua:Verb #;


LEXICON Obj
ni:1p+ Verb;
ku:2p+ Verb;
a:3p+ Verb;
tu:1Pl+ Verb;
wa:3Pl+ Verb;
